Washington statutes.
RCW 18.235.040

Director's authority.

The director has the following additional authority:

(1) To employ investigative, administrative, and clerical staff as necessary for the enforcement of this chapter, except as provided otherwise by statute;

(2) Upon request of a board or commission, to appoint not more than three pro tem members as provided in this subsection. Individuals appointed as pro tem members of a board or commission must meet the same minimum qualifications as regular members of the board or commission. While serving as a pro tem board or commission member, a person so appointed has all the powers, duties, and immunities, and is entitled to the entitlements, including travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, of a regular member of the board or commission; and

(3) To establish fees to be paid for witnesses, expert witnesses, and consultants used in any investigation or adjudicative proceedings as authorized by RCW 34.05.446.

[ 2007 c 256 s 13; 2002 c 86 s 105.]